Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 43 RECREATION DISTRICTS
§ 31-4328. Recreation facilities reserve fund election.

In any recreation district in which a recreation facilities reserve fund has been created, the board may submit to the qualified electors of the district, the question of applying the levy of six hundredths percent (.06%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property [within the] in a district or ten (10) mills in a district created pursuant to section 31-4304A, Idaho Code, authorized in section 31-4318, Idaho Code, or a portion thereof, to the credit of the recreation facilities reserve fund.

The notice of such election shall state the number of mills proposed to be levied, the period of years in each of which the levy is proposed to be made, and the purposes for which such funds shall be used. Said notice shall be given, the election shall be conducted and the returns canvassed as provided in sections 31-4323 through 31-4326, Idaho Code, and the levy shall be approved only if a majority, in the amount which is now, or may hereafter be, set by the constitution of the state of Idaho for approval of indebtedness, if [of] the qualified voters vote in favor.

If the question be approved, the board may make a levy in each year according to the terms so approved, and may again submit the question at the expiration of the period of such levy, for the number of mills and the number of years which the board may at that time determine, or, during the period approved at any such election, if such period be less than ten (10) years or the number of mills be less than three (3), the board may submit to the qualified electors in the same manner as before, the question whether the number of years, or the number of mills, or both, be increased, but not to exceed the maximum herein authorized. If such increase or increases be approved by the electors, the terms of such levy shall be in lieu of those approved in the first instance, but disapproval shall not affect any terms theretofore in effect.

§ 31-4329. Adoption of budget — Public hearing.

A board shall adopt a budget and cause a public hearing to be held upon such budget prior to certifying a tax levy to a board of county commissioners.

§ 31-4330. Notice of hearing — Posting and publication.

Notice of the budget hearing meeting shall be posted at least ten (10) full days prior to the date of said meeting in at least one (1) conspicuous place in each recreation district to be determined by the board, a copy of such notice shall also be published in a daily or weekly newspaper published within such recreation district, in one (1) issue thereof, during such ten (10) day period. The place, hour and day of such hearing shall be specified in said notice, as well as the place where such budget may be examined prior to such hearing. A full and complete copy of such proposed budget shall be published with and as a part of the publication of such notice of hearing.

§ 31-4331. Public inspection.

Such budget shall be available for public inspection from and after the date of the posting of notices of hearing as in this act provided, at such place and during such business hours as the board may direct.

§ 31-4332. Board attendance — Duties.

A quorum of the board of the recreation district shall attend such hearing and explain the proposed budget and hear any and all objections thereto.

§ 31-4333. Confirmation of elections and subdistrict boundaries.

That all recreation districts heretofore organized or purported to be organized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 43, title 31, Idaho Code, known as the “recreation district law,” the legal descriptions of the boundaries thereof and of the boundaries of the subdistricts therein, and all elections held or purported to have been held in such recreation districts prior to the effective date of this act, and all notices given and proceedings and actions taken in connection therewith are hereby confirmed, ratified and validated; and no contest shall be maintained concerning the organization of such districts, the boundaries thereof and of the subdistricts therein, such elections or such notices, proceedings and actions.